Hawaii statutes.
§188-45 Licenses for nehu, iao, and
other baitfish. The department may issue to commercial marine licensees,
as defined in chapter 187A, licenses to take nehu, iao, or any other species
for use as bait only. The department may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91
for the purposes of this section. The licenses may be issued by the department
upon terms and conditions the department may deem necessary to conserve the
supply of the fish within state waters. The license may be summarily revoked
for a violation of any term or condition of the license, and any or all
licenses may be revoked summarily whenever, in the judgment of the department,
the action is necessary for the conservation of the fish. [L 1929, c 206, §§1,
2; am L 1931, c 258, §1; am L 1933, c 54, §1; RL 1935, §390; am L 1943, c 54,
§1; RL 1945, §1237; am L 1947, c 179, §1; RL 1955, §21-78; am L Sp 1959 2d, c
1, §22; am L 1961, c 101, §1 and c 132, §2; HRS §188-45; am L 1974, c 222, §1;
am L 1981, c 85, §52; gen ch 1985; am L 1986, c 339, §12; am L 1999, c 85, §§2,
17; am L 2002, c 151, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next